Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.355

Electronic access to public records—Costs and fees.

Funding to meet the costs of providing access, including the building of the necessary information systems, the digitizing of information, developing the ability to mask nondisclosable information, and maintenance and upgrade of information access systems should come primarily from state and local appropriations, federal dollars, grants, private funds, cooperative ventures among governments, nonexclusive licensing, and public/private partnerships.

State agencies and local governments are encouraged to pool resources and to form cooperative ventures to provide electronic access to government records and information. State agencies are encouraged to seek federal and private grants for projects that provide increased efficiency and improve government delivery of information and services.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 217; 1996 c 171 s 12. Formerly RCW 43.41A.130, 43.105.280.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Captions not law—Effective dates—1996 c 171: See notes following RCW 2.68.050.